Washington statutes.
RCW 36.79.020

Rural arterial trust account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5161-S.SL) ***

There is created in the motor vehicle fund the rural arterial trust account. All moneys deposited in the motor vehicle fund to be credited to the rural arterial trust account shall be expended for (1) the construction and improvement of county rural arterials and collectors, (2) the construction of replacement bridges funded by the federal bridge replacement program on access roads in rural areas, and (3) those expenses of the board associated with the administration of the rural arterial program.

[ 1997 c 81 s 2; 1988 c 26 s 2; 1983 1st ex.s. c 49 s 2.]